Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201476-2,126
Certain conveyances; filing
of death certificate and attached cover sheet with register of deeds.

If a conveyance of real estate was pursuant to (1) a transfer on death
deed due to the death of the transferor or the death of a surviving joint
tenant of the transferor, (2) a joint tenancy deed due to the death of a joint
tenant, or (3) the expiration of a life estate, then a death certificate shall
be filed with the register of deeds to document the transfer of title to the
beneficiary of the transfer on death deed, to the surviving joint tenant or
joint tenants, or to the holder of an interest in real estate which receives
that interest as a result of the death of a life tenant. If
the conveyance of real estate was pursuant to a transfer on death deed, a cover
sheet indicating the title of the document, the previously recorded document
data, and the grantor, surviving grantee, and legal description of the property
being transferred shall be attached to the death certificate and recorded.

Laws 2012, LB536, § 31;

Laws 2013, LB345, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB780, § 2.